District of Columbia statutes.
23-321

Description of money.

In every indictment or information, except for forgery, in which it is necessary to make an averment as to any money or bank bill or notes, United States Treasury notes, postal and fractional currency, or other bills, bonds, or notes, issued by lawful authority and intended to pass and circulate as money, it shall be sufficient to describe such money, bills, notes, currency, or bonds simply as money, without specifying any particular coin, note, bill, or bond; and such allegation shall be sustained by proof that the accused has stolen or embezzled any amount of coin, or any such note, bill, currency, or bond, although the particular amount or species of such coin, note, bill, currency, or bond be not proved.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 612, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-321.
1973 Ed., § 23-321.